New York, session 2025-2026, S8069.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 6 and 7 of section 523-c of the executive law, 2 as added by section 2 of part K-6 of chapter 57 of the laws of 2007, are 3 amended and a new subdivision 8 is added to read as follows: 4 6. present significant complaints and concerns of youth residing in 5 facilities operated by the office to the commissioner, appropriate 6 office staff, and the independent review board; [and] 7 7. periodically review procedures established by the office to carry 8 out the provisions of this article, with a view toward the rights, safe- 9 ty and development of youth residing in facilities operated by the 10 office[.]; and 11 8. hear grievances and complaints and participate in administrative 12 hearings regarding child day care licenses issued pursuant to section 13 three hundred ninety of the social services law. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06464-01-5